California statutes. Penal Code
(b) A written report of an alleged sex offense shall indicate that the alleged victim has been properly informed pursuant to subdivision (a) and shall memorialize the victim’s response.

(c) A law enforcement agency shall not disclose to a person, except
 the prosecutor, parole officers of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, hearing officers of the parole authority, probation officers of county probation departments, or other persons or public agencies where authorized or required by law, the address of a person who alleges to be the victim of a sex offense.

(d) A law enforcement agency shall not disclose to a person, except the prosecutor, parole officers of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, hearing officers of the parole authority, probation officers of county probation departments, or other persons or public agencies where authorized or required by law, the name of a person who alleges to be the victim of a sex offense if that person has elected to exercise the person’s right pursuant to this section and Section 7923.615 of the Government Code.

(e) A law enforcement agency shall not disclose to a person, except the prosecutor, parole officers of the Department of
 Corrections and Rehabilitation, hearing officers of the parole authority, probation officers of county probation departments, or other persons or public agencies if authorized or required by law, names, addresses, or images of a person who alleges to be the victim of human trafficking, as defined in Section 236.1, or of that alleged victim’s immediate family, other than a family member who is charged with a criminal offense arising from the same incident, and that information and those images shall be withheld and remain confidential. The law enforcement agency shall orally inform the person who alleges to be the victim of human trafficking of that person’s right to have the person’s name, addresses, and images, and the names, addresses, and images of the person’s immediate family members withheld and kept confidential pursuant to this section and Section 7923.615 of the Government Code. For purposes
 of this subdivision, “immediate family” shall have the same meaning as that provided in paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 422.4 of the Penal Code.

(f) For purposes of this section, sex offense means any crime listed in subdivision (b) of Section 7923.615 of the Government Code.

(g) Parole officers of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, hearing officers of the parole authority, and probation officers of county probation departments shall be entitled to receive information pursuant to subdivisions (c), (d), and (e) only if the person to whom the information pertains alleges that the person is the victim of a sex offense or is the victim of human trafficking, as defined in Section 236.1, the alleged perpetrator of which is a parolee who is alleged to have
 committed the offense while on parole, or in the case of a county probation officer, the person who is alleged to have committed the offense is a probationer or is under investigation by a county probation
 department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 615, Sec. 334.   (AB 474)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative January 1, 2023, pursuant to Sec. 463 of Stats. 2021, Ch. 615.)
-------------------------------------------

293.5.

(a) Except as provided in Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 1054) of Part 2 of Title 7, or for cases in which the alleged victim of a sex offense, as specified in subdivision (f) of Section 293, has not elected to exercise the alleged victim’s right pursuant to Section 7923.615 of the Government Code, the court, at the request of the alleged victim, may order the identity of the alleged victim in all records and during all proceedings to be either Jane Doe or John Doe, if the court finds that type of order is reasonably necessary to protect the privacy of the person and will not unduly prejudice the prosecution or the defense.

(b) If the court orders the alleged victim to be identified
 as Jane Doe or John Doe pursuant to subdivision (a) and if there is a jury
 trial, the court shall instruct the jury, at the beginning and at the end of the trial, that the alleged victim is being so identified only for the purpose of protecting the alleged victim’s privacy pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 615, Sec. 335.   (AB 474)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative January 1, 2023, pursuant to Sec. 463 of Stats. 2021, Ch. 615.)
-------------------------------------------

294.

(a) Upon conviction of any person for a violation of Section 273a, 273d, 288.5, 311.2, 311.3, or 647.6, the court may, in addition to any other penalty or restitution fine imposed, order the defendant to pay a restitution fine based on the defendant’s ability to pay not to exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000), upon a felony conviction, or one thousand dollars ($1,000), upon a misdemeanor conviction, to be deposited in the Restitution Fund to be transferred to the county children’s trust fund for the purposes of child abuse prevention.

(b) Upon conviction of any person for a violation of Section 261, 264.1, 285, 286, 287, or 289
 or former Section 288a, where the violation is with a minor under the age of 14 years, the court may, in addition to any other penalty or restitution fine imposed, order the defendant to pay a restitution fine based on the defendant’s ability to pay not to exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000), upon a felony conviction, or one thousand dollars ($1,000), upon a misdemeanor conviction, to be deposited in the Restitution Fund to be transferred to the county children’s trust fund for the purpose of child abuse prevention.

(c) If the perpetrator is a member of the immediate family of the victim, the court shall consider in its decision to impose a fine under this section any hardship that may impact the victim from the imposition of the fine.

(d) If the court orders a fine to be imposed pursuant to this section, the actual administrative cost of collecting that fine, not to exceed 2 percent of the total amount paid, may be paid into the general fund of the county treasury for the use and benefit of the county.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 423, Sec. 61.   (SB 1494)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. DNA and Forensic Identification Data Base and Data Bank Act of  1998 [295. - 300.4.]



  ARTICLE 1. Purpose and Administration [295. - 295.2.]

295.

(a) This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the DNA and Forensic Identification Database and Data Bank Act of 1998, as amended.

(b) The people of the State of California set forth all of the following:

(1) Deoxyribonucleic acid (DNA) and forensic identification analysis is a useful law enforcement tool for identifying and prosecuting criminal offenders and exonerating the innocent.

(2) It is the intent of the people of the State of California, in order to further the purposes of this chapter, to require DNA and forensic identification data bank samples from all persons, including juveniles, for the felony and
 misdemeanor offenses described in subdivision (a) of Section 296.

(3) It is necessary to enact this act defining and governing the state’s DNA and forensic identification database and data bank in order to clarify existing law and to enable the state’s DNA and Forensic Identification Database and Data Bank Program to become a more effective law enforcement tool.

(c) The purpose of the DNA and Forensic Identification Database and Data Bank Program is to assist federal, state, and local criminal justice and law enforcement agencies within and outside California in the expeditious and accurate detection and prosecution of individuals responsible for sex offenses and other crimes, the exclusion of suspects who are being investigated for these crimes, and the identification of missing and unidentified persons, particularly abducted children.

(d) Like the collection of fingerprints, the collection of DNA samples pursuant to this chapter is an administrative requirement to assist in the accurate identification of criminal offenders.

(e) Unless otherwise requested by the Department of Justice, collection of biological samples for DNA analysis from qualifying persons under this chapter is limited to collection of inner cheek cells of the mouth (buccal swab samples).

(f) The Department of Justice DNA Laboratory may obtain through federal, state, or local law enforcement agencies blood specimens from qualifying persons as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 296, and according to procedures set forth in Section 298, when it is determined in the discretion of the Department of Justice that such specimens are necessary in a particular case or would aid the department
 in obtaining an accurate forensic DNA profile for identification purposes.

(g) The Department of Justice, through its DNA Laboratory, shall be responsible for the management and administration of the state’s DNA and Forensic Identification Database and Data Bank Program and for liaison with the Federal Bureau of Investigation (FBI) regarding the state’s participation in a national or international DNA database and data bank program such as the FBI’s Combined DNA Index System (CODIS) that allows the storage and exchange of DNA records submitted by state and local forensic DNA laboratories nationwide.

(h) The Department of Justice shall be responsible for implementing this chapter.

(1) The Department of Justice DNA Laboratory, and the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation may adopt policies and enact regulations
 for the implementation of this chapter, as necessary, to give effect to the intent and purpose of this chapter, and to ensure that data bank blood specimens, buccal swab samples, and thumb and palm print impressions as required by this chapter are collected from qualifying persons in a timely manner, as soon as possible after arrest, conviction, or a plea or finding of guilty, no contest, or not guilty by reason of insanity, or upon any disposition rendered in the case of a juvenile who is adjudicated under Section 602 of the Welfare and Institutions Code for commission of any of this chapter’s enumerated qualifying offenses, including attempts, or when it is determined that a qualifying person has not given the required specimens, samples, or print impressions. Before adopting any policy or regulation implementing this chapter, the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall seek advice from and consult with the Department of Justice DNA Laboratory Director.

(2) Given the specificity of this chapter, and except as provided in subdivision (c) of Section 298.1, any administrative bulletins, notices, regulations, policies, procedures, or guidelines adopted by the Department of Justice and its DNA Laboratory or the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation for the purpose of implementing this chapter are exempt from the provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act, Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340), Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 11370), Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 11400), and Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(3) The Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall submit copies of any of its policies and regulations with respect to this chapter to the Department of Justice DNA Laboratory Director, and quarterly shall submit to the director written
 reports updating the director as to the status of its compliance with this chapter.

(4) On or before April 1 in the year following adoption of the act that added this paragraph, and quarterly thereafter, the Department of Justice DNA Laboratory shall submit a quarterly report to be published electronically on a Department of Justice internet website and made available for public review. The quarterly report shall state the total number of samples received, the number of samples received from the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, the number of samples fully analyzed for inclusion in the CODIS database, and the number of profiles uploaded into the CODIS database for the reporting period. Each quarterly report shall state the total, annual, and quarterly number of qualifying profiles in the Department of Justice DNA Laboratory data bank both from persons and case evidence, and the number of hits and investigations aided, as reported to
 the National DNA Index System. The quarterly report shall also confirm the laboratory’s accreditation status and participation in CODIS and shall include an accounting of the funds collected, expended, and disbursed pursuant to subdivision (k).

(5) On or before April 1 in the year following adoption of the act that added this paragraph, and quarterly thereafter, the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall submit a quarterly report to be published electronically on a Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation internet website and made available for public review. The quarterly report shall state the total number of inmates housed in state correctional facilities, including a breakdown of those housed in state prisons, camps, community correctional facilities, and other facilities such as prisoner mother facilities. Each quarterly report shall also state the total, annual, and quarterly number of inmates who have yet to provide
 specimens, samples, and print impressions pursuant to this chapter and the number of specimens, samples, and print impressions that have yet to be forwarded to the Department of Justice DNA Laboratory within 30 days of collection.

(i) (1) When the specimens, samples, and print impressions required by this chapter are collected at a county jail or other county facility, including a private community correctional facility, the county sheriff or chief administrative officer of the county jail or other county facility shall be responsible for ensuring all of the following:

(A) The requisite specimens, samples, and print impressions are collected from qualifying persons immediately following arrest, conviction, or adjudication, or during the booking or intake or reception center process at that facility, or reasonably promptly thereafter.

(B) The requisite specimens, samples, and print impressions are collected as soon as administratively practicable after a qualifying person reports to the facility for the purpose of providing specimens, samples, and print impressions.

(C) The specimens, samples, and print impressions collected pursuant to this chapter are forwarded immediately to the Department of Justice, and in compliance with department policies.

(2) The specimens, samples, and print impressions required by this chapter shall be collected by a person using a collection kit approved by the Department of Justice and in accordance with the requirements and procedures set forth in subdivision (b) of Section 298.

(3) The counties shall be reimbursed for the costs of obtaining specimens,
 samples, and print impressions subject to the conditions and limitations set forth by the Department of Justice policies governing reimbursement for collecting specimens, samples, and print impressions pursuant to Section 76104.6 of the Government Code.

(j) The trial court may order that a portion of the costs assessed pursuant to Section 1203.1c or 1203.1m include a reasonable portion of the cost of obtaining specimens, samples, and print impressions in furtherance of this chapter and the funds collected pursuant to this subdivision shall be deposited in the DNA Identification Fund as created by Section 76104.6 of the Government Code.

(k) The Department of Justice DNA Laboratory shall be known as the Jan Bashinski DNA Laboratory.

(l) This section shall become operative on July 1,
 2021.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 29) and added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 92, Sec. 30.   (AB 1869)   Effective September 18, 2020.   Operative July 1, 2021, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

295.1.

(a) The Department of Justice shall perform DNA analysis and other forensic identification analysis pursuant to this chapter only for identification purposes.

(b) The Department of Justice Bureau of Criminal Identification and Information shall perform examinations of palm prints pursuant to this chapter only for identification purposes.

(c) The DNA Laboratory of the Department of Justice shall serve as a repository for blood specimens and buccal swab and other biological samples collected, and shall analyze specimens and samples, and store, compile, correlate, compare, maintain, and use DNA and forensic identification profiles and records related to the following:

(1) Forensic casework and forensic unknowns.

(2) Known and evidentiary specimens and samples from crime scenes or criminal investigations.

(3) Missing or unidentified persons.

(4) Persons required to provide specimens, samples, and print impressions under this chapter.

(5) Legally obtained samples.

(6) Anonymous DNA records used for training, research, statistical analysis of populations, quality assurance, or quality control.

(d) The computerized data bank and database of the DNA Laboratory of the Department of Justice shall include files as necessary to implement this chapter.

(e) Nothing in this section shall be construed as requiring the Department of Justice to provide specimens or samples for quality control or other purposes to those who request specimens or samples.

(f) Submission of samples, specimens, or profiles for the state DNA Database and Data Bank Program shall include information as required by the Department of Justice for ensuring search capabilities and compliance with National DNA Index System (NDIS) standards.

(History: Amended November 2, 2004, by initiative Proposition 69, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

295.2.

The DNA and forensic identification database and databank and the Department of Justice DNA Laboratory shall not be used as a source of genetic material for testing, research, or experiments, by any person, agency, or entity seeking to find a causal link between genetics and behavior or health.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 303, Sec. 386.   (AB 731)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Offenders Subject to Sample Collection [296. - 296.2.]

296.

(a) The following persons shall provide buccal swab samples, right thumbprints, and a full palm print impression of each hand, and any blood specimens or other biological samples required pursuant to this chapter for law enforcement identification analysis:

(1) Any person, including any juvenile, who is convicted of or pleads guilty or no contest to any felony offense, or is found not guilty by reason of insanity of any felony offense, or any juvenile who is adjudicated under Section 602 of the Welfare and Institutions Code for committing any felony offense.

(2) Any adult person who is arrested for or charged with any of the following felony offenses:

(A) Any felony offense specified in Section 290 or attempt to commit any felony offense described in Section 290, or any felony offense that imposes upon a person the duty to register in California as a sex offender under Section 290.

(B) Murder or voluntary manslaughter or any attempt to commit murder or voluntary manslaughter.

(C) Commencing on January 1 of the fifth year following enactment of the act that added this subparagraph, as amended, any adult person arrested or charged with any felony offense.

(3) Any person, including any juvenile, who is required to register under Section 290 or 457.1 because of the commission of, or the attempt to commit, a felony or misdemeanor offense, or any person, including any juvenile, who is housed in a mental health facility or sex offender treatment program after referral to such facility or program by a court after being charged with any felony offense.

(4) The term “felony” as used in this subdivision includes an attempt to commit the offense.

(5) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed as prohibiting collection and analysis of specimens, samples, or print impressions as a condition of a plea for a non-qualifying offense.

(b) The provisions of this chapter and its requirements for submission of specimens, samples and print impressions as soon as administratively practicable shall apply to all qualifying persons regardless of sentence imposed, including any sentence of death, life without the possibility of parole, or any life or indeterminate term, or any other disposition rendered in the case of an adult or juvenile tried as an adult, or whether the person is diverted, fined, or referred for evaluation, and regardless of disposition rendered or placement made in the case of juvenile who is found to have committed any felony offense or is adjudicated under Section 602 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(c) The provisions of this chapter and its requirements for submission of specimens, samples, and print impressions as soon as administratively practicable by qualified persons as described in subdivision (a) shall apply regardless of placement or confinement in any mental hospital or other public or private treatment facility, and shall include, but not be limited to, the following persons, including juveniles:

(1) Any person committed to a state hospital or other treatment facility as a mentally disordered sex offender under Article 1 (commencing with Section 6300) of Chapter 2 of Part 2 of Division 6 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(2) Any person who has a severe mental disorder as set forth within the provisions of Article 4 (commencing with Section 2960) of Chapter 7 of Title 1 of Part 3 of the Penal Code.

(3) Any person found to be a sexually violent predator pursuant to Article 4 (commencing with Section 6600) of Chapter 2 of Part 2 of Division 6 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(d) The provisions of this chapter are mandatory and apply whether or not the court advises a person, including any juvenile, that he or she must provide the data bank and database specimens, samples, and print impressions as a condition of probation, parole, or any plea of guilty, no contest, or not guilty by reason of insanity, or any admission to any of the offenses described in subdivision (a).

(e) If at any stage of court proceedings the prosecuting attorney determines that specimens, samples, and print impressions required by this chapter have not already been taken from any person, as defined under subdivision (a) of Section 296, the prosecuting attorney shall notify the court orally on the record, or in writing, and request that the court order collection of the specimens, samples, and print impressions required by law. However, a failure by the prosecuting attorney or any other law enforcement agency to notify the court shall not relieve a person of the obligation to provide specimens, samples, and print impressions pursuant to this chapter.

(f) Prior to final disposition or sentencing in the case the court shall inquire and verify that the specimens, samples, and print impressions required by this chapter have been obtained and that this fact is included in the abstract of judgment or dispositional order in the case of a juvenile. The abstract of judgment issued by the court shall indicate that the court has ordered the person to comply with the requirements of this chapter and that the person shall be included in the state’s DNA and Forensic Identification Data Base and Data Bank program and be subject to this chapter.

However, failure by the court to verify specimen, sample, and print impression collection or enter these facts in the abstract of judgment or dispositional order in the case of a juvenile shall not invalidate an arrest, plea, conviction, or disposition, or otherwise relieve a person from the requirements of this chapter.

(History: Amended November 2, 2004, by initiative Proposition 69, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

296.1.

(a) The specimens, samples, and print impressions required by this chapter shall be collected from persons described in subdivision (a) of Section 296 for present and past qualifying offenses of record as follows:

(1) Collection from any adult person following arrest for a felony offense as specified in subparagraphs (A), (B), and (C) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 296:

(A) Each adult person arrested for a felony offense as specified in subparagraphs (A), (B), and (C) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 296 shall provide the buccal swab samples and thumb and palm print impressions and any
 blood or other specimens required pursuant to this chapter immediately following arrest, or during the booking or intake or prison reception center process or as soon as administratively practicable after arrest, but, in any case, prior to release on bail or pending trial or any physical release from confinement or custody.

(B) If the person subject to this chapter did not have specimens, samples, and print impressions taken immediately following arrest or during booking or intake procedures or is released on bail or pending trial or is not confined or incarcerated at the time of sentencing or otherwise bypasses a prison inmate reception center maintained by the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, the court shall order the person to report within five calendar days to a county jail facility or to a city, state, local, private, or other designated facility to provide the required specimens, samples, and print impressions in accordance
 with subdivision (i) of Section 295.

(2) Collection from persons confined or in custody after conviction or adjudication:

(A) Any person, including any juvenile who is imprisoned or confined or placed in a state correctional institution, a county jail, a facility within the jurisdiction of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, the Corrections Standards Authority, a residential treatment program, or any state, local, city, private, or other facility after a conviction of any felony or misdemeanor offense, or any adjudication or disposition rendered in the case of a juvenile, whether or not that crime or offense is one set forth in subdivision (a) of Section 296, shall provide buccal swab samples and thumb and palm print impressions and any blood or other specimens required pursuant to this chapter, immediately at intake, or during the prison reception center process, or
 as soon as administratively practicable at the appropriate custodial or receiving institution or the program in which the person is placed, if:

(i) The person has a record of any past or present conviction or adjudication as a ward of the court in California of a qualifying offense described in subdivision (a) of Section 296 or has a record of any past or present conviction or adjudication in any other court, including any state, federal, or military court, of any offense that, if committed or attempted in this state, would have been punishable as an offense described in subdivision (a) of Section 296; and

(ii) The person’s blood specimens, buccal swab samples, and thumb and palm print impressions authorized by this chapter are not in the possession of the Department of Justice DNA Laboratory or have not been recorded as part of the department’s DNA databank program.

(3) Collection from persons on probation, parole, or other release:

(A) Any person, including any juvenile, who has a record of any past or present conviction or adjudication for an offense set forth in subdivision (a) of Section 296, and who is on probation, parole, postrelease community supervision, or mandatory supervision pursuant to paragraph (5) of subdivision (h) of Section 1170 for any felony or misdemeanor offense, whether or not that crime or offense is one set forth in subdivision (a) of Section 296, shall provide buccal swab samples and thumb and palm print impressions and any blood specimens required pursuant to this chapter, if:

(i) The person has a record of any past or present conviction or adjudication as a ward of the court in California of a qualifying offense described in subdivision (a) of Section
 296 or has a record of any past or present conviction or adjudication in any other court, including any state, federal, or military court, of any offense that, if committed or attempted in this state, would have been punishable as an offense described in subdivision (a) of Section 296; and

(ii) The person’s blood specimens, buccal swab samples, and thumb and palm print impressions authorized by this chapter are not in the possession of the Department of Justice DNA Laboratory or have not been recorded as part of the department’s DNA databank program.

(B) The person shall have any required specimens, samples, and print impressions collected within five calendar days of being notified by the court, or a law enforcement agency or other agency authorized by the Department of Justice. The specimens, samples, and print impressions shall be collected in accordance with subdivision (i) of
 Section 295 at a county jail facility or a city, state, local, private, or other facility designated for this collection.

(4) Collection from parole violators and others returned to custody:

(A) If a person, including any juvenile, who has been released on parole, furlough, or other release for any offense or crime, whether or not set forth in subdivision (a) of Section 296, is returned to a state correctional or other institution for a violation of a condition of his or her parole, furlough, or other release, or for any other reason, that person shall provide buccal swab samples and thumb and palm print impressions and any blood or other specimens required pursuant to this chapter, at a state correctional or other receiving institution, if:

(i) The person has a record of any past or present conviction or
 adjudication as a ward of the court in California of a qualifying offense described in subdivision (a) of Section 296 or has a record of any past or present conviction or adjudication in any other court, including any state, federal, or military court, of any offense that, if committed or attempted in this state, would have been punishable as an offense described in subdivision (a) of Section 296; and

(ii) The person’s blood specimens, buccal swab samples, and thumb and palm print impressions authorized by this chapter are not in the possession of the Department of Justice DNA Laboratory or have not been recorded as part of the department’s DNA databank program.

(5) Collection from persons accepted into California from other jurisdictions:

(A) When an offender from another state is accepted into this state under any
 of the interstate compacts described in Article 3 (commencing with Section 11175) or Article 4 (commencing with Section 11189) of Chapter 2 of Title 1 of Part 4 of this code, or Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 1400) of Part 1 of Division 2 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, or under any other reciprocal agreement with any county, state, or federal agency, or any other provision of law, whether or not the offender is confined or released, the acceptance is conditional on the offender providing blood specimens, buccal swab samples, and palm and thumb print impressions pursuant to this chapter, if the offender has a record of any past or present conviction or adjudication in California of a qualifying offense described in subdivision (a) of Section 296 or has a record of any past or present conviction or adjudication or had a disposition rendered in any other court, including any state, federal, or military court, of any offense that, if committed or attempted in this state, would have been punishable as
 an offense described in subdivision (a) of Section 296.

(B) If the person is not confined, the specimens, samples, and print impressions required by this chapter must be provided within five calendar days after the person reports to the supervising agent or within five calendar days of notice to the person, whichever occurs first. The person shall report to a county jail facility in the county where he or she resides or temporarily is located to have the specimens, samples, and print impressions collected pursuant to this chapter. The specimens, samples, and print impressions shall be collected in accordance with subdivision (i) of Section 295.

(C) If the person is confined, he or she shall provide the blood specimens, buccal swab samples, and thumb and palm print impressions required by this chapter as soon as practicable after his or her receipt in a state, county, city, local,
 private, or other designated facility.

(6) Collection from persons in federal institutions:

(A) Subject to the approval of the Director of the FBI, persons confined or incarcerated in a federal prison or federal institution who have a record of any past or present conviction or juvenile adjudication for a qualifying offense described in subdivision (a) of Section 296, or of a similar crime under the laws of the United States or any other state that would constitute an offense described in subdivision (a) of Section 296, are subject to this chapter and shall provide blood specimens, buccal swab samples, and thumb and palm print impressions pursuant to this chapter if any of the following apply:

(i) The person committed a qualifying offense in California.

(ii) The person was a resident of California at the time of the qualifying offense.

(iii) The person has any record of a California conviction for an offense described in subdivision (a) of Section 296, regardless of when the crime was committed.

(iv) The person will be released in California.

(B) The Department of Justice DNA Laboratory shall, upon the request of the United States Department of Justice, forward portions of the specimens or samples, taken pursuant to this chapter, to the United States Department of Justice DNA databank laboratory. The specimens and samples required by this chapter shall be taken in accordance with the procedures set forth in subdivision (i) of Section 295. The Department of Justice DNA Laboratory is authorized to analyze and upload specimens and samples collected pursuant
 to this section upon approval of the Director of the FBI.

(b) Paragraphs (2), (3), (4), (5), and (6) of subdivision (a) shall have retroactive application. Collection shall occur pursuant to paragraphs (2), (3), (4), (5), and (6) of subdivision (a) regardless of when the crime charged or committed became a qualifying offense pursuant to this chapter, and regardless of when the person was convicted of the qualifying offense described in subdivision (a) of Section 296 or a similar crime under the laws of the United States or any other state, or pursuant to the United States Code of Military Justice, 10 U.S.C., Sections 801 and following, or when a juvenile petition is sustained for commission of a qualifying offense described in subdivision (a) of Section 296 or a similar crime under the laws of the United States or any other state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 43, Sec. 17.   (SB 1023)   Effective June 27, 2012.   Note: This section was amended on Nov. 2, 2004, by initiative Prop. 69.)
-------------------------------------------

296.2.

(a) Whenever the DNA Laboratory of the Department of Justice notifies the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation or any law enforcement agency that a biological specimen or sample, or print impression is not usable for any reason, the person who provided the original specimen, sample, or print impression shall submit to collection of additional specimens, samples, or print impressions. The Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation or other responsible law enforcement agency shall collect additional specimens, samples, and print impressions from these persons as necessary to fulfill the requirements of this chapter, and transmit these specimens, samples, and print impressions to the appropriate agencies of the Department of Justice.

(b) If a person, including any juvenile, is convicted of, pleads guilty or no contest to, is found not guilty by reason of insanity of, or is adjudged a ward of the court under Section 602 of the Welfare and Institutions Code for committing, any of the offenses described in subdivision (a) of Section 296, and has given a blood specimen or other biological sample or samples to law enforcement for any purpose, the DNA Laboratory of the Department of Justice is authorized to analyze the blood specimen and other biological sample or samples for forensic identification markers, including DNA markers, and to include the DNA and forensic identification profiles from these specimens and samples in the state’s DNA and forensic identification databank and databases.

This subdivision applies whether or not the blood specimen or other biological sample originally was collected from the sexual or violent offender pursuant to the databank and database program, and whether or not the crime committed predated the enactment of the state’s DNA and forensic identification databank program, or any amendments thereto. This subdivision does not relieve a person convicted of a crime described in subdivision (a) of Section 296, or otherwise subject to this chapter, from the requirement to give blood specimens, saliva samples, and thumb and palm print impressions for the DNA and forensic identification databank and database program as described in this chapter.

(c) Any person who is required to register under the Sex Offender Registration Act who has not provided the specimens, samples, and print impressions described in this chapter for any reason including the release of the person prior to the enactment of the state’s DNA and forensic identification database and databank program, an oversight or error, or because of the transfer of the person from another state, the person, as an additional requirement of registration or of updating his or her annual registration pursuant to the Sex Offender Registration Act shall give specimens, samples, and print impressions as described in this chapter for inclusion in the state’s DNA and forensic identification database and databank.

At the time the person registers or updates his or her registration, he or she shall receive an appointment designating a time and place for the collection of the specimens, samples, and print impressions described in this chapter, if he or she has not already complied with the provisions of this chapter.

As specified in the appointment, the person shall report to a county jail facility in the county where he or she resides or is temporarily located to have specimens, samples, and print impressions collected pursuant to this chapter or other facility approved by the Department of Justice for this collection. The specimens, samples, and print impressions shall be collected in accordance with subdivision (f) of Section 295.

If, prior to the time of the annual registration update, a person is notified by the Department of Justice, a probation or parole officer, other law enforcement officer, or officer of the court, that he or she is subject to this chapter, then the person shall provide the specimens, samples, and print impressions required by this chapter within 10 calendar days of the notification at a county jail facility or other facility approved by the department for this collection.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 579, Sec. 37.   Effective October 13, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Data Base Applications [297. - 297.]

297.
